Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.240

Violations—Claims against bond or alternative.

(1) The director or any person injured by a violation of this chapter may bring an action against the surety bond or approved alternative of the licensed mortgage broker who committed the violation or who employed or engaged the loan originator who committed the violation.

(2)(a) The director or any person who is damaged by the licensee's or its loan originator's violation of this chapter, or rules adopted under this chapter, may bring suit upon the surety bond or approved alternative in the superior court of any county in which jurisdiction over the licensee may be obtained. Jurisdiction shall be exclusively in the superior court. Except as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section, in the event valid claims of borrowers against a bond or deposit exceed the amount of the bond or deposit, each borrower claimant shall only be entitled to a pro rata amount, based on the amount of the claim as it is valid against the bond or deposit, without regard to the date of filing of any claim or action. If, after all valid borrower claims are paid, valid claims by nonborrower claimants exceed the remaining amount of the bond or deposit, each nonborrower claimant shall only be entitled to a pro rata amount, based on the amount of the claim as it is valid against the bond or deposit, without regard to the date of the filing or any claim or action. A judgment arising from a violation of this chapter or rule adopted under this chapter shall be entered for actual damages and in no case be less than the amount paid by the borrower to the licensed mortgage broker plus reasonable attorneys' fees and costs. In no event shall the surety bond or approved alternative provide payment for any trebled or punitive damages.

(b) Borrowers shall be given priority over the director and other persons in distributions in actions against the surety bond. The director and other third parties shall then be entitled to distribution to the extent of their claims as found valid against the remainder of the bond. In the case of claims made by any person or entity who is not a borrower, no final judgment may be entered prior to one hundred eighty days following the date the claim is filed. This provision regarding priority shall not restrict the right of any claimant to file a claim.

(3) The remedies provided under this section are cumulative and nonexclusive and do not affect any other remedy available at law.

[ 2013 c 30 s 6; 1997 c 106 s 15; 1994 c 33 s 21; 1993 c 468 s 14.]

NOTES:

Severability—1997 c 106: See note following RCW 19.146.010.

Adoption of rules—Severability—1993 c 468: See notes following RCW 19.146.0201.

Effective dates—1993 c 468: See note following RCW 19.146.200.